Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.505.090

Budget—Format, classifications, mandatory.

Every school district budget shall be prepared, submitted and adopted in the format prescribed by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The budget classifications contained in said format shall be in accordance with the accounting manual for public school districts, published by the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the office of the state auditor. Budgets prepared and adopted in a format other than that prescribed by the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall not be official and will have no legal effect.

[ 1983 c 59 s 6; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 9. Formerly RCW 28A.65.440.]

NOTES:

Application—Effective date—Severability—1983 c 59: See notes following RCW 28A.505.010.

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118: See note following RCW 28A.505.010.